Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.390

Style, format, and numbering—Agency compliance.

After the rules of an agency have been published by the code reviser:

(1) All agency orders amending or rescinding such rules, or creating new rules, shall be formulated in accordance with the style, format, and numbering system of the Washington Administrative Code;

(2) Any subsequent printing or reprinting of such rules shall be printed in the style and format (including the numbering system) of such code; and

(3) Amendments of previously adopted rules shall incorporate any editorial corrections made by the code reviser.

[ 1988 c 288 s 317; 1967 c 237 s 14. Formerly RCW 34.04.057.]